Illinois, session 104th, SB315.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Artificial Intelligence Safety Measures Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:7    "Affiliate" means a person controlling, controlled by, or 8under common control with a specified person, directly or 9indirectly, through one or more intermediaries.10    "Agency" means the Illinois Emergency Management Agency 11and Office of Homeland Security.12    "Artificial intelligence" or "AI" has the meaning ascribed 13to the term "artificial intelligence" in Section 5 of the 14Digital Voice and Likeness Protection Act. "Artificial 15intelligence" or "AI" includes generative artificial 16intelligence.17    "Catastrophic risk" means a foreseeable and material risk 18that a frontier developer's development, storage, use, or 19deployment of a frontier model will materially contribute to 20the death of, or serious injury to, more than 50 people or more 21than $1,000,000,000 in damage to, or loss of, property arising 22from a single incident involving a frontier model doing any of 23the following:  SB0315 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 06438 SPS 16474 b1        (1) providing expert-level assistance in the creation 2    or release of a chemical, biological, radiological, or 3    nuclear weapon;4        (2) engaging in conduct with no meaningful human 5    oversight, intervention, or supervision that is either a 6    cyberattack or, if the conduct had been committed by a 7    human, would constitute the crime of murder, assault, 8    extortion, or theft, including theft by false pretense; or9        (3) evading the control of its frontier developer or 10    user.11    "Catastrophic risk" does not include a foreseeable and 12material risk from any of the following:13        (1) information that a frontier model outputs if the 14    information is otherwise publicly accessible in a 15    substantially similar form from a source other than a 16    foundation model;17        (2) lawful activity of the federal government; or18        (3) harm caused by a frontier model in combination 19    with other software if the frontier model did not 20    materially contribute to the harm.21    "Covered employee" means an employee responsible for 22assessing, managing, or addressing the risk of critical safety 23incidents.24    "Critical safety incident" means any of the following:25        (1) unauthorized access to, modification of, or 26    exfiltration of, the model weights of a frontier model   SB0315 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 06438 SPS 16474 b1    that results in death or bodily injury;2        (2) harm resulting from the materialization of a 3    catastrophic risk;4        (3) loss of control of a frontier model causing death 5    or bodily injury; or6        (4) a frontier model that uses deceptive techniques 7    against the frontier developer to subvert the controls or 8    monitoring of its frontier developer outside of the 9    context of an evaluation designed to elicit this behavior 10    and in a manner that demonstrates materially increased 11    catastrophic risk.12    "Deploy" means to make a frontier model available to a 13third party for use, modification, copying, or combination 14with other software. "Deploy" does not include making a 15frontier model available to a third party for the primary 16purpose of researching, developing, or evaluating the frontier 17model.18    "Foundation model" means an artificial intelligence model 19that is all of the following:20        (1) trained on a broad data set;21        (2) designed for generality of output; and22        (3) adaptable to a wide range of distinctive tasks.23    "Frontier AI framework" means documented technical and 24organizational protocols to manage, assess, and mitigate 25catastrophic risks.26    "Frontier developer" means a person who trains, or   SB0315 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 06438 SPS 16474 b1initiates the training of, a frontier model using computing 2power that meets the technical specifications set forth in the 3definition of "frontier model".4    "Frontier model" means a foundation model that was trained 5using a quantity of computing power greater than 1026 integer 6or floating-point operations. The quantity of computing power 7described in this definition shall include computing for the 8original training run and for any subsequent fine-tuning, 9reinforcement learning, or other material modifications the 10developer applies to a preceding foundation model.11    "Large frontier developer" means a frontier developer 12that, together with its affiliates, collectively had annual 13gross revenues in excess of $500,000,000 in the preceding 14calendar year.15    "Model weight" means a numerical parameter in a frontier 16model that is adjusted through training and that helps 17determine how inputs are transformed into outputs.18    "Person" means an individual, proprietorship, firm, 19partnership, joint venture, syndicate, business, trust, 20company, corporation, limited liability company, association, 21committee, or any other nongovernmental organization or group 22of persons acting in concert.23    "Property" means tangible or intangible property. 24    Section 10. Frontier AI framework.25    (a) Beginning January 1, 2028, a large frontier developer   SB0315 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 06438 SPS 16474 b1shall write, implement, comply with, and clearly and 2conspicuously publish on its website a frontier AI framework 3that applies to the large frontier developer's frontier models 4and describes how the large frontier developer approaches all 5of the following:6        (1) incorporating national standards, international 7    standards, and industry-consensus best practices into its 8    frontier AI framework;9        (2) defining and assessing thresholds used by the 10    large frontier developer to identify and assess whether a 11    frontier model has capabilities that could pose a 12    catastrophic risk, which may include multiple-tiered 13    thresholds;14        (3) applying mitigations to address the potential for 15    catastrophic risks based on the results of assessments 16    undertaken pursuant to paragraph (2);17        (4) reviewing assessments and adequacy of mitigations 18    as part of the decision to deploy a frontier model or use 19    it extensively internally;20        (5) using third parties to assess the potential for 21    catastrophic risks and the effectiveness of mitigations of 22    catastrophic risks;23        (6) revisiting and updating the frontier AI framework, 24    including any criteria that trigger updates and how the 25    large frontier developer determines when its frontier 26    models are substantially modified enough to require   SB0315 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 06438 SPS 16474 b1    disclosures pursuant to subsection (c);2        (7) cybersecurity practices to secure unreleased model 3    weights from unauthorized modification or transfer by 4    internal or external parties;5        (8) identifying and responding to critical safety 6    incidents;7        (9) instituting internal governance practices to 8    ensure implementation of these processes; and9        (10) assessing and managing catastrophic risk 10    resulting from the internal use of its frontier models, 11    including risks resulting from a frontier model 12    circumventing oversight mechanisms.13    (b)(1) A large frontier developer shall review and, as 14appropriate, update its frontier AI framework at least once 15per year.16    (2) If a large frontier developer makes a material 17modification to its frontier AI framework, the large frontier 18developer shall clearly and conspicuously publish on its 19website the modified frontier AI framework and a justification 20for that modification within 30 days.21    (c)(1) Before, or concurrently with, deploying a new 22frontier model or a substantially modified version of an 23existing frontier model, a frontier developer shall clearly 24and conspicuously publish on its website a transparency report 25containing all of the following:26            (A) the website of the frontier developer;  SB0315 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 06438 SPS 16474 b1            (B) a mechanism that enables a natural person to 2        communicate with the frontier developer;3            (C) the release date of the frontier model;4            (D) the languages supported by the frontier model;5            (E) the modalities of output supported by the 6        frontier model;7            (F) the intended uses of the frontier model; and8            (G) any generally applicable restrictions or 9        conditions on uses of the frontier model.10    (2) Before, or concurrently with, deploying a new frontier 11model or a substantially modified version of an existing 12frontier model, a large frontier developer shall include in 13the transparency report required by paragraph (1) of this 14subsection (c) summaries of all of the following:15            (A) assessments of catastrophic risks from the 16        frontier model conducted pursuant to the large 17        frontier developer's frontier AI framework;18            (B) the results of the assessments under 19        subparagraph (A);20            (C) the extent to which third-party evaluators 21        were involved; and22            (D) other steps taken to fulfill the requirements 23        of the frontier AI framework with respect to the 24        frontier model.25    (3) All summaries required under paragraph (2) shall be 26provided in a machine-readable format to facilitate   SB0315 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 06438 SPS 16474 b1verification of model claims. 2    (4) A frontier developer that publishes the information 3described in paragraph (1) or (2) as part of a larger document, 4including a system card or model card, shall be deemed in 5compliance with the applicable paragraph.6    (5) A frontier developer is encouraged, but not required, 7to make disclosures described in this subsection (c) that are 8consistent with, or superior to, industry best practices.9    (d) Beginning on January 1, 2028 or 90 days after a 10developer first qualifies as a large frontier developer, 11whichever is later, a large frontier developer shall annually 12retain a third party to perform an independent audit of 13compliance with the requirements of this Section. The third 14party shall conduct audits consistent with generally accepted 15auditing standards and best practices and shall possess 16demonstrated competence to perform the audit, including 17experience employing or contracting with individuals who 18possess technical expertise in the safety of frontier models. 19A large frontier developer shall not retain a third party if 20either the large frontier developer or the third party has a 21financial interest in the other party. A large frontier 22developer may compensate a third party for its services but 23shall not condition any payment or the amount of any payment on 24the results of the third party's audit. 25        (1) The third party shall be granted access to all 26    materials reasonably necessary to comply with the third   SB0315 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 06438 SPS 16474 b1    party's obligations under this subsection (d), including, 2    but not limited to, all unredacted versions of materials 3    published pursuant to this Act. To protect the frontier 4    developer's trade secrets and confidential business 5    information, cybersecurity, national security of the 6    United States, or public safety, a large frontier 7    developer may impose security protocols on the third 8    party, including, but not limited to, restrictions on note 9    taking, copying, retaining, or removing materials; 10    requirements for on-premise review; and confidentiality 11    requirements.12        (2) The third party shall produce a report that 13    includes all of the following:14            (A) a description of whether the large frontier 15        developer has substantially complied with the 16        requirements of this Section;17            (B) if applicable, a description of material 18        deviations from the requirements of this Section, an 19        explanation of any deviation and its rationale, and 20        any recommendations for how the developer can improve 21        its policies and processes for ensuring compliance 22        with the requirements of this Section;23            (C) a detailed assessment of the large frontier 24        developer's internal controls, including its 25        designation and empowerment of senior personnel 26        responsible for such implementation by the large   SB0315 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 06438 SPS 16474 b1        frontier developer, its employees, and its 2        contractors;3            (D) a list of the personnel involved in the audit; 4            (E) the third party's procedures for managing 5        conflicts of interest and any conflicts of interest of 6        any personnel involved in the audit; 7            (F) the methodology of the audit and the nature of 8        the information reviewed by the third party to conduct 9        the audit; and10            (G) the signature of the lead auditor certifying 11        the results of the audit.12        (3) The large frontier developer shall retain an 13    unredacted copy of the report for as long as a frontier 14    model is deployed plus 5 years.15        (4)(A) No later than 30 days after receiving the audit 16    report, the large frontier developer shall conspicuously 17    publish on its website a high-level summary of the audit 18    findings and a copy of the third party's report with 19    appropriate redactions and transmit a copy of the redacted 20    report to the Agency and the Attorney General.21        (B) The large frontier developer shall grant the 22    Agency and the Attorney General access to the third 23    party's report, with redactions, upon request, subject to 24    the redactions permitted under subsection (g).25    (e) A large frontier developer shall transmit to the 26Agency a summary of any assessment of catastrophic risk   SB0315 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 06438 SPS 16474 b1resulting from internal use of its frontier models every 3 2months or pursuant to another reasonable schedule specified by 3the large frontier developer and communicated in writing to 4the Agency and the Attorney General with written updates, as 5appropriate and agreed upon by the Agency. 6    (f)(1) A frontier developer shall not make a materially 7false or misleading statement about catastrophic risk from its 8frontier models or its management of catastrophic risk.9    A large frontier developer shall not make a materially 10false or misleading statement about its implementation of, or 11compliance with, its frontier AI framework.12    (2) This subsection (f) does not apply to a statement that 13was made in good faith and was reasonable under the 14circumstances.15    (g)(1) When a frontier developer publishes documents to 16comply with this Section, the frontier developer may make 17redactions to those documents that are necessary to protect 18the frontier developer's trade secrets, the frontier 19developer's cybersecurity, public safety, or the national 20security of the United States or to comply with any federal or 21State law.22    (2) If a frontier developer redacts information in a 23document pursuant to this subsection (g), the frontier 24developer shall describe the character and justification of 25the redaction in any published version of the document to the 26extent permitted by the concerns that justify redaction and   SB0315 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 06438 SPS 16474 b1shall retain the unredacted information for 5 years. 2    Section 15. Reporting critical safety incidents.3    (a) The Agency, in consultation with the Attorney General, 4shall establish a mechanism to be used by a frontier developer 5or a member of the public to report a critical safety incident 6that includes all of the following:7        (1) the date of the critical safety incident;8        (2) the reasons the incident qualifies as a critical 9    safety incident;10        (3) a short and plain statement describing the 11    critical safety incident; and12        (4) whether the incident was associated with internal 13    use of a frontier model.14    (b)(1) The Agency, in consultation with the Attorney 15General, shall establish a mechanism to be used by a large 16frontier developer to confidentially submit summaries of any 17assessments of the potential for catastrophic risk resulting 18from internal use of its frontier models.19    (2) The Agency and the Attorney General shall take all 20necessary precautions to limit access to any reports related 21to internal use of frontier models to only personnel with a 22specific need to know the information and to protect the 23reports from unauthorized access.24    (c) A frontier developer shall report any critical safety 25incident pertaining to one or more of its frontier models to   SB0315 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 06438 SPS 16474 b1the Agency and the Attorney General within 72 hours of the 2frontier developer learning facts sufficient to establish a 3reasonable belief that a critical safety incident has 4occurred. The disclosure shall include: (i) the date of the 5critical safety incident; (ii) the reasons the incident 6qualifies as a critical safety incident as defined in this 7Act; and (iii) a short and plain statement describing the 8critical safety incident. If a frontier developer discovers 9that a critical safety incident poses an imminent risk of 10death or serious physical injury, the frontier developer shall 11disclose that incident within 24 hours to an authority, 12including any law enforcement agency or public safety agency 13with jurisdiction, that is appropriate based on the nature of 14that incident and as required by law. A frontier developer 15that discovers information about a critical safety incident 16after filing the initial report required by this subsection 17(c) may file an amended report. A frontier developer is 18encouraged, but not required, to report critical safety 19incidents pertaining to foundation models that are not 20frontier models.21    (d) The Agency and the Attorney General shall review 22critical safety incident reports submitted by frontier 23developers and may review reports submitted by members of the 24public.25    (e) The Attorney General or the Agency may transmit 26reports of critical safety incidents to the General Assembly,   SB0315 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 06438 SPS 16474 b1the Governor, the federal government, or appropriate State 2agencies. The Attorney General and the Agency shall strongly 3consider any risks related to trade secrets, public safety, 4cybersecurity of a frontier developer, or national security 5when transmitting reports.6    (f) The following records are exempt from disclosure under 7the Freedom of Information Act: 8        (1) any report of a critical safety incident submitted 9    to the Agency or the Attorney General; 10        (2) any report of an assessment of catastrophic risk 11    from internal use under subsection (e) of Section 10; 12        (3) any unredacted version of the third party audit 13    report produced under subsection (d) of Section 10 in the 14    possession of the Agency or the Attorney General;15        (4) any materials, work papers, notes, or derivative 16    documents prepared by a third party in connection with an 17    audit under subsection (d) of Section 10, to the extent 18    such materials come into the possession of the Agency or 19    the Attorney General; and 20        (5) any covered employee report made under Section 30. 21    (g)(1) By January 1, 2029, and by each January 1 22thereafter, the Agency, in consultation with the Attorney 23General, shall produce a report that includes the following: 24        (A) anonymized and aggregated information about 25    critical safety incidents that have been reviewed by the 26    Agency or the Attorney General since the preceding report;  SB0315 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 06438 SPS 16474 b1        (B) information that the Agency deems relevant to 2    frontier model safety;3        (C) recommended updates to this Act, if any; and4        (D) any developments relevant to the purposes of this 5    Act.6    (2) The Agency and the Attorney General shall not include 7information in a report that would compromise the trade 8secrets or cybersecurity of a frontier developer, public 9safety, or the national security of the United States or that 10would be prohibited by any federal or State law.11    (3) The Agency, in consultation with the Attorney General, 12shall transmit the report under this subsection (g) to the 13General Assembly and to the Governor. 14    Section 17. Interoperability. 15    (a) The Agency, in consultation with the Attorney General, 16shall designate on its website a declaration process and one 17or more federal laws, regulations, or guidance documents that 18meet all of the following conditions for the purposes of 19subsection (b):20        (1) the law, regulation, or guidance document imposes 21    or states standards or requirements for critical safety 22    incident reporting that are substantially equivalent to, 23    or stricter than, those required by this Act;24        (2) the law, regulation, or guidance document 25    described in paragraph (1) does not need to require   SB0315 Enrolled- 16 -LRB104 06438 SPS 16474 b1    critical safety incident reporting to the State of 2    Illinois;3        (3) the law, regulation, or guidance document is 4    intended to assess, detect, or mitigate the catastrophic 5    risk in ways that are substantially equivalent to this 6    Act; and7        (4) the law, regulation, or guidance document requires 8    the large frontier developer to undergo independent 9    third-party audits of its assessment of catastrophic risks 10    and critical safety incident reporting with requirements 11    that are substantially equivalent to, or stricter than, 12    those required by this Act. 13    (b)(1) A frontier developer that intends to comply with 14this Act by complying with the requirements of, or meeting the 15standards stated by, a federal law, regulation, or guidance 16document designated in subsection (a) shall declare its intent 17to do so to the Agency by following the process outlined on the 18Agency's website.19    (2) After a frontier developer has declared its intent 20pursuant to paragraph (1), both of the following apply:21        (A) the frontier developer shall be deemed in 22    compliance with this Act to the extent that the frontier 23    developer meets the standards of, or complies with the 24    requirements imposed or stated by, the designated federal 25    law, regulation, or guidance document until the frontier 26    developer declares the revocation of that intent to the   SB0315 Enrolled- 17 -LRB104 06438 SPS 16474 b1    Agency in the manner provided for on the Agency's website; 2    and3        (B) the failure by a frontier developer to meet the 4    standards of, or comply with the requirements stated by, 5    the federal law, regulation, or guidance document 6    designated pursuant to subsection (a) shall constitute a 7    violation of this Act.8    (c) The Agency shall issue updated guidance documents on 9its website if the requirements of subsection (a) are no 10longer met. 11    Section 18. Large frontier developer disclosure. 12    (a) Except as otherwise provided in this Section, 13beginning January 1, 2027, no large frontier developer may 14develop, deploy, or operate a frontier model, in whole or in 15part in this State, without having a current disclosure 16statement filed with the Agency and paying the required fee. 17    (b) The disclosure statement shall be filed in the form 18and the manner prescribed by the Agency on the Agency's 19website and shall contain all the information required by the 20Agency. It shall be renewed annually, whenever ownership of 21the frontier model is transferred or whenever there is a 22material change to the information reported in the previously 23filed disclosure statement, whichever occurs earlier. 24    (c) The disclosure statement shall identify: 25        (1) the identity of the large frontier developer and   SB0315 Enrolled- 18 -LRB104 06438 SPS 16474 b1    all names under which such large frontier developer 2    conducts business; 3        (2) the address of the principal place of business and 4    the address of each office the large frontier developer 5    maintains in this State; 6        (3) in the event the large frontier developer or the 7    ultimate parent of the large frontier developer is a 8    privately or closely held company, a list of all persons 9    or entities that beneficially own a 5% or greater interest 10    in the large frontier developer at the time the disclosure 11    statement is filed and a list of persons who formerly 12    beneficially owned a 5% or greater interest in the owner 13    or its predecessors in the preceding 5 years; in the event 14    the owner or the ultimate parent is a publicly traded 15    company, the owner shall file a list of all persons or 16    entities that beneficially own a 50% or greater interest 17    in the large frontier developer at the time of disclosure; 18    and 19        (4) the name and contact information of a point of 20    contact, secondary contact, and tertiary contact for the 21    large frontier developer; the point of contact shall be 22    responsible for receiving inquiries relating to this Act 23    from the Agency or other governmental entities. 24    (d) The Agency shall charge and collect fees from large 25frontier developers for the expenses of administering this 26Act, which shall be nonrefundable unless otherwise indicated.   SB0315 Enrolled- 19 -LRB104 06438 SPS 16474 b1Each large frontier developer shall pay to the Agency its pro 2rata share of the cost of administration of this Act, as 3estimated by the Agency, for the current year and any deficit 4actually incurred in the administration of the Act in prior 5years. 6    (e) If any person develops, deploys, or operates a large 7frontier model in this State without a current disclosure 8filed with the Agency as required by this Section, submits 9false information in its disclosure or fails to timely pay any 10assessment required by this Act, in addition to any other 11penalty or liability that may be imposed under this Act, the 12Agency may, after notice and hearing, levy civil penalties, 13fees, and costs as follows: 14        (1) a civil penalty of $1,000 for each day the person 15    fails to file a disclosure as required by this Section or 16    fails to correct false information; and 17        (2) an amount equal to the assessments owed. 18    (f) The Agency shall maintain and publish a list of large 19frontier developers who have filed disclosure statements; 20however, the publication shall not include the contact 21information set forth in subsection (c). 22    Section 20. Whistleblower protections. 23    (a) A frontier developer shall not make, adopt, enforce, 24or enter into a rule, regulation, policy, or contract that 25prevents a covered employee from disclosing, or retaliates   SB0315 Enrolled- 20 -LRB104 06438 SPS 16474 b1against a covered employee for disclosing, information to the 2Agency, Attorney General, a federal authority, a person with 3authority over the covered employee, or another covered 4employee who has authority to investigate, discover, or 5correct the reported issue, if the covered employee has 6reasonable cause to believe that the information discloses 7that:8        (1) the frontier developer's activities pose a 9    specific and substantial danger to the public health or 10    safety resulting from a catastrophic risk; or11        (2) the frontier developer has violated this Act.12    (b) A frontier developer shall not enter into a contract 13that prevents a covered employee from making a disclosure 14protected under the Whistleblower Act.15    (c) A covered employee may use the Attorney General's 16Workplace Rights Hotline to make reports described in 17subsection (a).18    (d) A frontier developer shall provide a clear notice to 19all covered employees of their rights and responsibilities 20under this Section, including by doing either of the 21following:22        (1) at all times posting and displaying within any 23    workplace maintained by the frontier developer a notice to 24    all covered employees of their rights under this Section, 25    ensuring that any new covered employee receives equivalent 26    notice, and ensuring that any covered employee who works   SB0315 Enrolled- 21 -LRB104 06438 SPS 16474 b1    remotely periodically receives an equivalent notice; or2        (2) at least once each year, providing written notice 3    to each covered employee of the covered employee's rights 4    under this Section and ensuring that the notice is 5    received and acknowledged by all of those covered 6    employees.7    (e)(1) A large frontier developer shall provide a 8reasonable internal process through which a covered employee 9may anonymously disclose information to the large frontier 10developer if the covered employee believes in good faith that 11the information indicates that the large frontier developer's 12activities present a specific and substantial danger to the 13public health or safety resulting from a catastrophic risk or 14that the large frontier developer violated this Act, including 15a monthly update to the person who made the disclosure 16regarding the status of the large frontier developer's 17investigation of the disclosure and the actions taken by the 18large frontier developer in response to the disclosure.19    (2)(A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B), the 20disclosures and responses of the process required by this 21subsection (e) shall be shared with officers and directors of 22the large frontier developer at least once each quarter.23    (B) If a covered employee has alleged wrongdoing by an 24officer or director of the large frontier developer in a 25disclosure or response, subparagraph (A) shall not apply with 26respect to that officer or director.  SB0315 Enrolled- 22 -LRB104 06438 SPS 16474 b1    (f) This Section does not impair or limit the 2applicability of the Whistleblower Act, including with respect 3to the rights of employees who are not covered employees to 4report violations of this Act. 5    Section 25. Civil penalty.6    (a) A large frontier developer that fails to publish or 7transmit a compliant document required to be published or 8transmitted under this Act, makes a statement in violation of 9subsection (f) of Section 10, fails to have a third party 10perform an independent audit of compliance as required by 11subsection (d) of Section 10, fails to report a critical 12safety incident as required by Section 15, or fails to comply 13with its own frontier AI framework shall be subject to a civil 14penalty in an amount dependent upon the severity of the 15violation that does not exceed $1,000,000 for the first 16violation. For a subsequent violation, the civil penalty may 17not exceed $3,000,000 per violation.18    (b) A civil penalty described in this Section shall be 19recovered in a civil action brought exclusively by the 20Attorney General. Any civil penalties collected from the 21enforcement of this Act shall be deposited into the Attorney 22General Court Ordered and Voluntary Compliance Payment 23Projects Fund.24    (c) The loss of value of equity does not count as damage to 25or loss of property for the purposes of this Act.  SB0315 Enrolled- 23 -LRB104 06438 SPS 16474 b1    (d) Nothing in this Act shall be construed to establish a 2private right of action associated with violations of this 3Act.  4    Section 30. Duties and obligations. The duties and 5obligations imposed by this Act are cumulative with any other 6duties or obligations imposed under other law and shall not be 7construed to relieve any party from any duties or obligations 8imposed under other law and do not limit any rights or remedies 9under existing law. 10    Section 35. Home rule. The regulation of artificial 11intelligence frontier models is an exclusive power and 12function of the State. This Section is a denial and limitation 13of home rule powers and functions under subsection (h) of 14Section 6 of Article VII of the Illinois Constitution. 15    Section 80. The Freedom of Information Act is amended by 16changing Section 7.5 as follows: 17    (5 ILCS 140/7.5)18    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 104-441 and 19104-457)20    Sec. 7.5. Statutory exemptions. To the extent provided for 21by the statutes referenced below, the following shall be 22exempt from inspection and copying:  SB0315 Enrolled- 24 -LRB104 06438 SPS 16474 b1        (a) All information determined to be confidential 2    under Section 4002 of the Technology Advancement and 3    Development Act.4        (b) Library circulation and order records identifying 5    library users with specific materials under the Library 6    Records Confidentiality Act.7        (c) Applications, related documents, and medical 8    records received by the Experimental Organ Transplantation 9    Procedures Board and any and all documents or other 10    records prepared by the Experimental Organ Transplantation 11    Procedures Board or its staff relating to applications it 12    has received.13        (d) Information and records held by the Department of 14    Public Health and its authorized representatives relating 15    to known or suspected cases of sexually transmitted 16    infection or any information the disclosure of which is 17    restricted under the Illinois Sexually Transmitted 18    Infection Control Act.19        (e) Information the disclosure of which is exempted 20    under Section 30 of the Radon Industry Licensing Act.21        (f) Firm performance evaluations under Section 55 of 22    the Architectural, Engineering, and Land Surveying 23    Qualifications Based Selection Act.24        (g) Information the disclosure of which is restricted 25    and exempted under Section 50 of the Illinois Prepaid 26    Tuition Act.  SB0315 Enrolled- 25 -LRB104 06438 SPS 16474 b1        (h) Information the disclosure of which is exempted 2    under the State Officials and Employees Ethics Act, and 3    records of any lawfully created State or local inspector 4    general's office that would be exempt if created or 5    obtained by an Executive Inspector General's office under 6    that Act.7        (i) Information contained in a local emergency energy 8    plan submitted to a municipality in accordance with a 9    local emergency energy plan ordinance that is adopted 10    under Section 11-21.5-5 of the Illinois Municipal Code.11        (j) Information and data concerning the distribution 12    of surcharge moneys collected and remitted by carriers 13    under the Emergency Telephone System Act.14        (k) Law enforcement officer identification information 15    or driver identification information compiled by a law 16    enforcement agency or the Department of Transportation 17    under Section 11-212 of the Illinois Vehicle Code.18        (l) Records and information provided to a residential 19    health care facility resident sexual assault and death 20    review team or the Executive Council under the Abuse 21    Prevention Review Team Act.22        (m) Information provided to the predatory lending 23    database created pursuant to Article 3 of the Residential 24    Real Property Disclosure Act, except to the extent 25    authorized under that Article.26        (n) Defense budgets and petitions for certification of   SB0315 Enrolled- 26 -LRB104 06438 SPS 16474 b1    compensation and expenses for court appointed trial 2    counsel as provided under Sections 10 and 15 of the 3    Capital Crimes Litigation Act (repealed). This subsection 4    (n) shall apply until the conclusion of the trial of the 5    case, even if the prosecution chooses not to pursue the 6    death penalty prior to trial or sentencing.7        (o) Information that is prohibited from being 8    disclosed under Section 4 of the Illinois Health and 9    Hazardous Substances Registry Act.10        (p) Security portions of system safety program plans, 11    investigation reports, surveys, schedules, lists, data, or 12    information compiled, collected, or prepared by or for the 13    Department of Transportation under Sections 2705-300 and 14    2705-616 of the Department of Transportation Law of the 15    Civil Administrative Code of Illinois, the Regional 16    Transportation Authority under Section 2.11 of the 17    Regional Transportation Authority Act, or the St. Clair 18    County Transit District under the Bi-State Transit Safety 19    Act (repealed). 20        (q) Information prohibited from being disclosed by the 21    Personnel Record Review Act. 22        (r) Information prohibited from being disclosed by the 23    Illinois School Student Records Act. 24        (s) Information the disclosure of which is restricted 25    under Section 5-108 of the Public Utilities Act. 26        (t) (Blank).   SB0315 Enrolled- 27 -LRB104 06438 SPS 16474 b1        (u) Records and information provided to an independent 2    team of experts under the Developmental Disability and 3    Mental Health Safety Act (also known as Brian's Law). 4        (v) Names and information of people who have applied 5    for or received Firearm Owner's Identification Cards under 6    the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act or applied for 7    or received a concealed carry license under the Firearm 8    Concealed Carry Act, unless otherwise authorized by the 9    Firearm Concealed Carry Act; and databases under the 10    Firearm Concealed Carry Act, records of the Concealed 11    Carry Licensing Review Board under the Firearm Concealed 12    Carry Act, and law enforcement agency objections under the 13    Firearm Concealed Carry Act. 14        (v-5) Records of the Firearm Owner's Identification 15    Card Review Board that are exempted from disclosure under 16    Section 10 of the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act.17        (w) Personally identifiable information which is 18    exempted from disclosure under subsection (g) of Section 19    19.1 of the Toll Highway Act.20        (x) Information which is exempted from disclosure 21    under Section 5-1014.3 of the Counties Code or Section 22    8-11-21 of the Illinois Municipal Code. 23        (y) Confidential information under the Adult 24    Protective Services Act and its predecessor enabling 25    statute, the Elder Abuse and Neglect Act, including 26    information about the identity and administrative finding   SB0315 Enrolled- 28 -LRB104 06438 SPS 16474 b1    against any caregiver of a verified and substantiated 2    decision of abuse, neglect, or financial exploitation of 3    an eligible adult maintained in the Registry established 4    under Section 7.5 of the Adult Protective Services Act. 5        (z) Records and information provided to a fatality 6    review team or the Illinois Fatality Review Team Advisory 7    Council under Section 15 of the Adult Protective Services 8    Act. 9        (aa) Information which is exempted from disclosure 10    under Section 2.37 of the Wildlife Code. 11        (bb) Information which is or was prohibited from 12    disclosure by the Juvenile Court Act of 1987. 13        (cc) Recordings made under the Law Enforcement 14    Officer-Worn Body Camera Act, except to the extent 15    authorized under that Act.16        (dd) Information that is prohibited from being 17    disclosed under Section 45 of the Condominium and Common 18    Interest Community Ombudsperson Act. 19        (ee) Information that is exempted from disclosure 20    under Section 30.1 of the Pharmacy Practice Act. 21        (ff) Information that is exempted from disclosure 22    under the Revised Uniform Unclaimed Property Act. 23        (gg) Information that is prohibited from being 24    disclosed under Section 7-603.5 of the Illinois Vehicle 25    Code. 26        (hh) Records that are exempt from disclosure under   SB0315 Enrolled- 29 -LRB104 06438 SPS 16474 b1    Section 1A-16.7 of the Election Code. 2        (ii) Information which is exempted from disclosure 3    under Section 2505-800 of the Department of Revenue Law of 4    the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. 5        (jj) Information and reports that are required to be 6    submitted to the Department of Labor by registering day 7    and temporary labor service agencies but are exempt from 8    disclosure under subsection (a-1) of Section 45 of the Day 9    and Temporary Labor Services Act. 10        (kk) Information prohibited from disclosure under the 11    Seizure and Forfeiture Reporting Act. 12        (ll) Information the disclosure of which is restricted 13    and exempted under Section 5-30.8 of the Illinois Public 14    Aid Code. 15        (mm) Records that are exempt from disclosure under 16    Section 4.2 of the Crime Victims Compensation Act. 17        (nn) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 18    Section 70 of the Higher Education Student Assistance Act. 19        (oo) Communications, notes, records, and reports 20    arising out of a peer support counseling session 21    prohibited from disclosure under the First Responders 22    Suicide Prevention Act. 23        (pp) Names and all identifying information relating to 24    an employee of an emergency services provider or law 25    enforcement agency under the First Responders Suicide 26    Prevention Act.   SB0315 Enrolled- 30 -LRB104 06438 SPS 16474 b1        (qq) Information and records held by the Department of 2    Public Health and its authorized representatives collected 3    under the Reproductive Health Act. 4        (rr) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 5    the Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act. 6        (ss) Data reported by an employer to the Department of 7    Human Rights pursuant to Section 2-108 of the Illinois 8    Human Rights Act.9        (tt) Recordings made under the Children's Advocacy 10    Center Act, except to the extent authorized under that 11    Act. 12        (uu) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 13    Section 50 of the Sexual Assault Evidence Submission Act. 14        (vv) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 15    subsections (f) and (j) of Section 5-36 of the Illinois 16    Public Aid Code. 17        (ww) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 18    Section 16.8 of the State Treasurer Act. 19        (xx) Information that is exempt from disclosure or 20    information that shall not be made public under the 21    Illinois Insurance Code. 22        (yy) Information prohibited from being disclosed under 23    the Illinois Educational Labor Relations Act.24        (zz) Information prohibited from being disclosed under 25    the Illinois Public Labor Relations Act. 26        (aaa) Information prohibited from being disclosed   SB0315 Enrolled- 31 -LRB104 06438 SPS 16474 b1    under Section 1-167 of the Illinois Pension Code. 2        (bbb) Information that is prohibited from disclosure 3    by the Illinois Police Training Act and the Illinois State 4    Police Act. 5        (ccc) Records exempt from disclosure under Section 6    2605-304 of the Illinois State Police Law of the Civil 7    Administrative Code of Illinois. 8        (ddd) Information prohibited from being disclosed 9    under Section 35 of the Address Confidentiality for 10    Victims of Domestic Violence, Sexual Assault, Human 11    Trafficking, or Stalking Act. 12        (eee) Information prohibited from being disclosed 13    under subsection (b) of Section 75 of the Domestic 14    Violence Fatality Review Act. 15        (fff) Images from cameras under the Expressway Camera 16    Act and all automated license plate reader (ALPR) 17    information used and collected by the Illinois State 18    Police. "ALPR information" means information gathered by 19    an ALPR or created from the analysis of data generated by 20    an ALPR. This subsection (fff) is inoperative on and after 21    July 1, 2028.22        (ggg) Information prohibited from disclosure under 23    paragraph (3) of subsection (a) of Section 14 of the Nurse 24    Agency Licensing Act. 25        (hhh) Information submitted to the Illinois State 26    Police in an affidavit or application for an assault   SB0315 Enrolled- 32 -LRB104 06438 SPS 16474 b1    weapon endorsement, assault weapon attachment endorsement, 2    .50 caliber rifle endorsement, or .50 caliber cartridge 3    endorsement under the Firearm Owners Identification Card 4    Act. 5        (iii) Data exempt from disclosure under Section 50 of 6    the School Safety Drill Act. 7        (jjj) Information exempt from disclosure under Section 8    30 of the Insurance Data Security Law. 9        (kkk) Confidential business information prohibited 10    from disclosure under Section 45 of the Paint Stewardship 11    Act. 12        (lll) Data exempt from disclosure under Section 13    2-3.196 of the School Code. 14        (mmm) Information prohibited from being disclosed 15    under subsection (e) of Section 1-129 of the Illinois 16    Power Agency Act. 17        (nnn) Materials received by the Department of Commerce 18    and Economic Opportunity that are confidential under the 19    Music and Musicians Tax Credit and Jobs Act. 20        (ooo) Data or information provided pursuant to Section 21    20 of the Statewide Recycling Needs and Assessment Act. 22        (ppp) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 23    Section 28-11 of the Lawful Health Care Activity Act. 24        (qqq) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 25    Section 7-101 of the Illinois Human Rights Act. 26        (rrr) Information prohibited from being disclosed   SB0315 Enrolled- 33 -LRB104 06438 SPS 16474 b1    under Section 4-2 of the Uniform Money Transmission 2    Modernization Act. 3        (sss) Information exempt from disclosure under Section 4    40 of the Student-Athlete Endorsement Rights Act.5        (ttt) Audio recordings made under Section 30 of the 6    Illinois State Police Act, except to the extent authorized 7    under that Section. 8        (uuu) Information prohibited from being disclosed 9    under Section 30-5 of the Digital Assets Regulation Act.10        (vvv) Information exempt from disclosure under 11    subsection (f) of Section 15 of the Artificial 12    Intelligence Safety Measures Act.13(Source: P.A. 103-8, eff. 6-7-23; 103-34, eff. 6-9-23; 14103-142, eff. 1-1-24; 103-372, eff. 1-1-24; 103-472, eff. 158-1-24; 103-508, eff. 8-4-23; 103-580, eff. 12-8-23; 103-592, 16eff. 6-7-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-636, eff. 7-1-24; 17103-724, eff. 1-1-25; 103-786, eff. 8-7-24; 103-859, eff. 188-9-24; 103-991, eff. 8-9-24; 103-1049, eff. 8-9-24; 103-1081, 19eff. 3-21-25; 104-10, eff. 6-16-25; 104-18, eff. 6-30-25; 20104-417, eff. 8-15-25; 104-428, eff. 8-18-25; revised 219-10-25.) 22    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 104-457 but 23before 104-441)24    Sec. 7.5. Statutory exemptions. To the extent provided for 25by the statutes referenced below, the following shall be   SB0315 Enrolled- 34 -LRB104 06438 SPS 16474 b1exempt from inspection and copying:2        (a) All information determined to be confidential 3    under Section 4002 of the Technology Advancement and 4    Development Act.5        (b) Library circulation and order records identifying 6    library users with specific materials under the Library 7    Records Confidentiality Act.8        (c) Applications, related documents, and medical 9    records received by the Experimental Organ Transplantation 10    Procedures Board and any and all documents or other 11    records prepared by the Experimental Organ Transplantation 12    Procedures Board or its staff relating to applications it 13    has received.14        (d) Information and records held by the Department of 15    Public Health and its authorized representatives relating 16    to known or suspected cases of sexually transmitted 17    infection or any information the disclosure of which is 18    restricted under the Illinois Sexually Transmitted 19    Infection Control Act.20        (e) Information the disclosure of which is exempted 21    under Section 30 of the Radon Industry Licensing Act.22        (f) Firm performance evaluations under Section 55 of 23    the Architectural, Engineering, and Land Surveying 24    Qualifications Based Selection Act.25        (g) Information the disclosure of which is restricted 26    and exempted under Section 50 of the Illinois Prepaid   SB0315 Enrolled- 35 -LRB104 06438 SPS 16474 b1    Tuition Act.2        (h) Information the disclosure of which is exempted 3    under the State Officials and Employees Ethics Act, and 4    records of any lawfully created State or local inspector 5    general's office that would be exempt if created or 6    obtained by an Executive Inspector General's office under 7    that Act.8        (i) Information contained in a local emergency energy 9    plan submitted to a municipality in accordance with a 10    local emergency energy plan ordinance that is adopted 11    under Section 11-21.5-5 of the Illinois Municipal Code.12        (j) Information and data concerning the distribution 13    of surcharge moneys collected and remitted by carriers 14    under the Emergency Telephone System Act.15        (k) Law enforcement officer identification information 16    or driver identification information compiled by a law 17    enforcement agency or the Department of Transportation 18    under Section 11-212 of the Illinois Vehicle Code.19        (l) Records and information provided to a residential 20    health care facility resident sexual assault and death 21    review team or the Executive Council under the Abuse 22    Prevention Review Team Act.23        (m) Information provided to the predatory lending 24    database created pursuant to Article 3 of the Residential 25    Real Property Disclosure Act, except to the extent 26    authorized under that Article.  SB0315 Enrolled- 36 -LRB104 06438 SPS 16474 b1        (n) Defense budgets and petitions for certification of 2    compensation and expenses for court appointed trial 3    counsel as provided under Sections 10 and 15 of the 4    Capital Crimes Litigation Act (repealed). This subsection 5    (n) shall apply until the conclusion of the trial of the 6    case, even if the prosecution chooses not to pursue the 7    death penalty prior to trial or sentencing.8        (o) Information that is prohibited from being 9    disclosed under Section 4 of the Illinois Health and 10    Hazardous Substances Registry Act.11        (p) Security portions of system safety program plans, 12    investigation reports, surveys, schedules, lists, data, or 13    information compiled, collected, or prepared by or for the 14    Department of Transportation under Sections 2705-300 and 15    2705-616 of the Department of Transportation Law of the 16    Civil Administrative Code of Illinois, the Northern 17    Illinois Transit Authority under Section 2.11 of the 18    Northern Illinois Transit Authority Act, or the St. Clair 19    County Transit District under the Bi-State Transit Safety 20    Act (repealed). 21        (q) Information prohibited from being disclosed by the 22    Personnel Record Review Act. 23        (r) Information prohibited from being disclosed by the 24    Illinois School Student Records Act. 25        (s) Information the disclosure of which is restricted 26    under Section 5-108 of the Public Utilities Act.   SB0315 Enrolled- 37 -LRB104 06438 SPS 16474 b1        (t) (Blank). 2        (u) Records and information provided to an independent 3    team of experts under the Developmental Disability and 4    Mental Health Safety Act (also known as Brian's Law). 5        (v) Names and information of people who have applied 6    for or received Firearm Owner's Identification Cards under 7    the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act or applied for 8    or received a concealed carry license under the Firearm 9    Concealed Carry Act, unless otherwise authorized by the 10    Firearm Concealed Carry Act; and databases under the 11    Firearm Concealed Carry Act, records of the Concealed 12    Carry Licensing Review Board under the Firearm Concealed 13    Carry Act, and law enforcement agency objections under the 14    Firearm Concealed Carry Act. 15        (v-5) Records of the Firearm Owner's Identification 16    Card Review Board that are exempted from disclosure under 17    Section 10 of the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act.18        (w) Personally identifiable information which is 19    exempted from disclosure under subsection (g) of Section 20    19.1 of the Toll Highway Act.21        (x) Information which is exempted from disclosure 22    under Section 5-1014.3 of the Counties Code or Section 23    8-11-21 of the Illinois Municipal Code. 24        (y) Confidential information under the Adult 25    Protective Services Act and its predecessor enabling 26    statute, the Elder Abuse and Neglect Act, including   SB0315 Enrolled- 38 -LRB104 06438 SPS 16474 b1    information about the identity and administrative finding 2    against any caregiver of a verified and substantiated 3    decision of abuse, neglect, or financial exploitation of 4    an eligible adult maintained in the Registry established 5    under Section 7.5 of the Adult Protective Services Act. 6        (z) Records and information provided to a fatality 7    review team or the Illinois Fatality Review Team Advisory 8    Council under Section 15 of the Adult Protective Services 9    Act. 10        (aa) Information which is exempted from disclosure 11    under Section 2.37 of the Wildlife Code. 12        (bb) Information which is or was prohibited from 13    disclosure by the Juvenile Court Act of 1987. 14        (cc) Recordings made under the Law Enforcement 15    Officer-Worn Body Camera Act, except to the extent 16    authorized under that Act.17        (dd) Information that is prohibited from being 18    disclosed under Section 45 of the Condominium and Common 19    Interest Community Ombudsperson Act. 20        (ee) Information that is exempted from disclosure 21    under Section 30.1 of the Pharmacy Practice Act. 22        (ff) Information that is exempted from disclosure 23    under the Revised Uniform Unclaimed Property Act. 24        (gg) Information that is prohibited from being 25    disclosed under Section 7-603.5 of the Illinois Vehicle 26    Code.   SB0315 Enrolled- 39 -LRB104 06438 SPS 16474 b1        (hh) Records that are exempt from disclosure under 2    Section 1A-16.7 of the Election Code. 3        (ii) Information which is exempted from disclosure 4    under Section 2505-800 of the Department of Revenue Law of 5    the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. 6        (jj) Information and reports that are required to be 7    submitted to the Department of Labor by registering day 8    and temporary labor service agencies but are exempt from 9    disclosure under subsection (a-1) of Section 45 of the Day 10    and Temporary Labor Services Act. 11        (kk) Information prohibited from disclosure under the 12    Seizure and Forfeiture Reporting Act. 13        (ll) Information the disclosure of which is restricted 14    and exempted under Section 5-30.8 of the Illinois Public 15    Aid Code. 16        (mm) Records that are exempt from disclosure under 17    Section 4.2 of the Crime Victims Compensation Act. 18        (nn) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 19    Section 70 of the Higher Education Student Assistance Act. 20        (oo) Communications, notes, records, and reports 21    arising out of a peer support counseling session 22    prohibited from disclosure under the First Responders 23    Suicide Prevention Act. 24        (pp) Names and all identifying information relating to 25    an employee of an emergency services provider or law 26    enforcement agency under the First Responders Suicide   SB0315 Enrolled- 40 -LRB104 06438 SPS 16474 b1    Prevention Act. 2        (qq) Information and records held by the Department of 3    Public Health and its authorized representatives collected 4    under the Reproductive Health Act. 5        (rr) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 6    the Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act. 7        (ss) Data reported by an employer to the Department of 8    Human Rights pursuant to Section 2-108 of the Illinois 9    Human Rights Act.10        (tt) Recordings made under the Children's Advocacy 11    Center Act, except to the extent authorized under that 12    Act. 13        (uu) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 14    Section 50 of the Sexual Assault Evidence Submission Act. 15        (vv) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 16    subsections (f) and (j) of Section 5-36 of the Illinois 17    Public Aid Code. 18        (ww) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 19    Section 16.8 of the State Treasurer Act. 20        (xx) Information that is exempt from disclosure or 21    information that shall not be made public under the 22    Illinois Insurance Code. 23        (yy) Information prohibited from being disclosed under 24    the Illinois Educational Labor Relations Act.25        (zz) Information prohibited from being disclosed under 26    the Illinois Public Labor Relations Act.   SB0315 Enrolled- 41 -LRB104 06438 SPS 16474 b1        (aaa) Information prohibited from being disclosed 2    under Section 1-167 of the Illinois Pension Code. 3        (bbb) Information that is prohibited from disclosure 4    by the Illinois Police Training Act and the Illinois State 5    Police Act. 6        (ccc) Records exempt from disclosure under Section 7    2605-304 of the Illinois State Police Law of the Civil 8    Administrative Code of Illinois. 9        (ddd) Information prohibited from being disclosed 10    under Section 35 of the Address Confidentiality for 11    Victims of Domestic Violence, Sexual Assault, Human 12    Trafficking, or Stalking Act. 13        (eee) Information prohibited from being disclosed 14    under subsection (b) of Section 75 of the Domestic 15    Violence Fatality Review Act. 16        (fff) Images from cameras under the Expressway Camera 17    Act and all automated license plate reader (ALPR) 18    information used and collected by the Illinois State 19    Police. "ALPR information" means information gathered by 20    an ALPR or created from the analysis of data generated by 21    an ALPR. This subsection (fff) is inoperative on and after 22    July 1, 2028.23        (ggg) Information prohibited from disclosure under 24    paragraph (3) of subsection (a) of Section 14 of the Nurse 25    Agency Licensing Act. 26        (hhh) Information submitted to the Illinois State   SB0315 Enrolled- 42 -LRB104 06438 SPS 16474 b1    Police in an affidavit or application for an assault 2    weapon endorsement, assault weapon attachment endorsement, 3    .50 caliber rifle endorsement, or .50 caliber cartridge 4    endorsement under the Firearm Owners Identification Card 5    Act. 6        (iii) Data exempt from disclosure under Section 50 of 7    the School Safety Drill Act. 8        (jjj) Information exempt from disclosure under Section 9    30 of the Insurance Data Security Law. 10        (kkk) Confidential business information prohibited 11    from disclosure under Section 45 of the Paint Stewardship 12    Act. 13        (lll) Data exempt from disclosure under Section 14    2-3.196 of the School Code. 15        (mmm) Information prohibited from being disclosed 16    under subsection (e) of Section 1-129 of the Illinois 17    Power Agency Act. 18        (nnn) Materials received by the Department of Commerce 19    and Economic Opportunity that are confidential under the 20    Music and Musicians Tax Credit and Jobs Act. 21        (ooo) Data or information provided pursuant to Section 22    20 of the Statewide Recycling Needs and Assessment Act. 23        (ppp) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 24    Section 28-11 of the Lawful Health Care Activity Act. 25        (qqq) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 26    Section 7-101 of the Illinois Human Rights Act.   SB0315 Enrolled- 43 -LRB104 06438 SPS 16474 b1        (rrr) Information prohibited from being disclosed 2    under Section 4-2 of the Uniform Money Transmission 3    Modernization Act. 4        (sss) Information exempt from disclosure under Section 5    40 of the Student-Athlete Endorsement Rights Act.6        (ttt) Audio recordings made under Section 30 of the 7    Illinois State Police Act, except to the extent authorized 8    under that Section. 9        (uuu) Information prohibited from being disclosed 10    under Section 30-5 of the Digital Assets Regulation Act.11        (vvv) Information exempt from disclosure under 12    subsection (f) of Section 15 of the Artificial 13    Intelligence Safety Measures Act.14(Source: P.A. 103-8, eff. 6-7-23; 103-34, eff. 6-9-23; 15103-142, eff. 1-1-24; 103-372, eff. 1-1-24; 103-472, eff. 168-1-24; 103-508, eff. 8-4-23; 103-580, eff. 12-8-23; 103-592, 17eff. 6-7-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-636, eff. 7-1-24; 18103-724, eff. 1-1-25; 103-786, eff. 8-7-24; 103-859, eff. 198-9-24; 103-991, eff. 8-9-24; 103-1049, eff. 8-9-24; 103-1081, 20eff. 3-21-25; 104-10, eff. 6-16-25; 104-18, eff. 6-30-25; 21104-417, eff. 8-15-25; 104-428, eff. 8-18-25; 104-457, eff. 226-1-26; revised 1-7-26.) 23    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 104-441)24    Sec. 7.5. Statutory exemptions. To the extent provided for 25by the statutes referenced below, the following shall be   SB0315 Enrolled- 44 -LRB104 06438 SPS 16474 b1exempt from inspection and copying:2        (a) All information determined to be confidential 3    under Section 4002 of the Technology Advancement and 4    Development Act.5        (b) Library circulation and order records identifying 6    library users with specific materials under the Library 7    Records Confidentiality Act.8        (c) Applications, related documents, and medical 9    records received by the Experimental Organ Transplantation 10    Procedures Board and any and all documents or other 11    records prepared by the Experimental Organ Transplantation 12    Procedures Board or its staff relating to applications it 13    has received.14        (d) Information and records held by the Department of 15    Public Health and its authorized representatives relating 16    to known or suspected cases of sexually transmitted 17    infection or any information the disclosure of which is 18    restricted under the Illinois Sexually Transmitted 19    Infection Control Act.20        (e) Information the disclosure of which is exempted 21    under Section 30 of the Radon Industry Licensing Act.22        (f) Firm performance evaluations under Section 55 of 23    the Architectural, Engineering, and Land Surveying 24    Qualifications Based Selection Act.25        (g) Information the disclosure of which is restricted 26    and exempted under Section 50 of the Illinois Prepaid   SB0315 Enrolled- 45 -LRB104 06438 SPS 16474 b1    Tuition Act.2        (h) Information the disclosure of which is exempted 3    under the State Officials and Employees Ethics Act, and 4    records of any lawfully created State or local inspector 5    general's office that would be exempt if created or 6    obtained by an Executive Inspector General's office under 7    that Act.8        (i) Information contained in a local emergency energy 9    plan submitted to a municipality in accordance with a 10    local emergency energy plan ordinance that is adopted 11    under Section 11-21.5-5 of the Illinois Municipal Code.12        (j) Information and data concerning the distribution 13    of surcharge moneys collected and remitted by carriers 14    under the Emergency Telephone System Act.15        (k) Law enforcement officer identification information 16    or driver identification information compiled by a law 17    enforcement agency or the Department of Transportation 18    under Section 11-212 of the Illinois Vehicle Code.19        (l) Records and information provided to a residential 20    health care facility resident sexual assault and death 21    review team or the Executive Council under the Abuse 22    Prevention Review Team Act.23        (m) Information provided to the predatory lending 24    database created pursuant to Article 3 of the Residential 25    Real Property Disclosure Act, except to the extent 26    authorized under that Article.  SB0315 Enrolled- 46 -LRB104 06438 SPS 16474 b1        (n) Defense budgets and petitions for certification of 2    compensation and expenses for court appointed trial 3    counsel as provided under Sections 10 and 15 of the 4    Capital Crimes Litigation Act (repealed). This subsection 5    (n) shall apply until the conclusion of the trial of the 6    case, even if the prosecution chooses not to pursue the 7    death penalty prior to trial or sentencing.8        (o) Information that is prohibited from being 9    disclosed under Section 4 of the Illinois Health and 10    Hazardous Substances Registry Act.11        (p) Security portions of system safety program plans, 12    investigation reports, surveys, schedules, lists, data, or 13    information compiled, collected, or prepared by or for the 14    Department of Transportation under Sections 2705-300 and 15    2705-616 of the Department of Transportation Law of the 16    Civil Administrative Code of Illinois, the Northern 17    Illinois Transit Authority under Section 2.11 of the 18    Northern Illinois Transit Authority Act, or the St. Clair 19    County Transit District under the Bi-State Transit Safety 20    Act (repealed). 21        (q) Information prohibited from being disclosed by the 22    Personnel Record Review Act. 23        (r) Information prohibited from being disclosed by the 24    Illinois School Student Records Act. 25        (s) Information the disclosure of which is restricted 26    under Section 5-108 of the Public Utilities Act.   SB0315 Enrolled- 47 -LRB104 06438 SPS 16474 b1        (t) (Blank). 2        (u) Records and information provided to an independent 3    team of experts under the Developmental Disability and 4    Mental Health Safety Act (also known as Brian's Law). 5        (v) Names and information of people who have applied 6    for or received Firearm Owner's Identification Cards under 7    the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act or applied for 8    or received a concealed carry license under the Firearm 9    Concealed Carry Act, unless otherwise authorized by the 10    Firearm Concealed Carry Act; and databases under the 11    Firearm Concealed Carry Act, records of the Concealed 12    Carry Licensing Review Board under the Firearm Concealed 13    Carry Act, and law enforcement agency objections under the 14    Firearm Concealed Carry Act. 15        (v-5) Records of the Firearm Owner's Identification 16    Card Review Board that are exempted from disclosure under 17    Section 10 of the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act.18        (w) Personally identifiable information which is 19    exempted from disclosure under subsection (g) of Section 20    19.1 of the Toll Highway Act.21        (x) Information which is exempted from disclosure 22    under Section 5-1014.3 of the Counties Code or Section 23    8-11-21 of the Illinois Municipal Code. 24        (y) Confidential information under the Adult 25    Protective Services Act and its predecessor enabling 26    statute, the Elder Abuse and Neglect Act, including   SB0315 Enrolled- 48 -LRB104 06438 SPS 16474 b1    information about the identity and administrative finding 2    against any caregiver of a verified and substantiated 3    decision of abuse, neglect, or financial exploitation of 4    an eligible adult maintained in the Registry established 5    under Section 7.5 of the Adult Protective Services Act. 6        (z) Records and information provided to a fatality 7    review team or the Illinois Fatality Review Team Advisory 8    Council under Section 15 of the Adult Protective Services 9    Act. 10        (aa) Information which is exempted from disclosure 11    under Section 2.37 of the Wildlife Code. 12        (bb) Information which is or was prohibited from 13    disclosure by the Juvenile Court Act of 1987. 14        (cc) Recordings made under the Law Enforcement 15    Officer-Worn Body Camera Act, except to the extent 16    authorized under that Act.17        (dd) Information that is prohibited from being 18    disclosed under Section 45 of the Condominium and Common 19    Interest Community Ombudsperson Act. 20        (ee) Information that is exempted from disclosure 21    under Section 30.1 of the Pharmacy Practice Act. 22        (ff) Information that is exempted from disclosure 23    under the Revised Uniform Unclaimed Property Act. 24        (gg) Information that is prohibited from being 25    disclosed under Section 7-603.5 of the Illinois Vehicle 26    Code.   SB0315 Enrolled- 49 -LRB104 06438 SPS 16474 b1        (hh) Records that are exempt from disclosure under 2    Section 1A-16.7 of the Election Code. 3        (ii) Information which is exempted from disclosure 4    under Section 2505-800 of the Department of Revenue Law of 5    the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. 6        (jj) Information and reports that are required to be 7    submitted to the Department of Labor by registering day 8    and temporary labor service agencies but are exempt from 9    disclosure under subsection (a-1) of Section 45 of the Day 10    and Temporary Labor Services Act. 11        (kk) Information prohibited from disclosure under the 12    Seizure and Forfeiture Reporting Act. 13        (ll) Information the disclosure of which is restricted 14    and exempted under Section 5-30.8 of the Illinois Public 15    Aid Code. 16        (mm) Records that are exempt from disclosure under 17    Section 4.2 of the Crime Victims Compensation Act. 18        (nn) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 19    Section 70 of the Higher Education Student Assistance Act. 20        (oo) Communications, notes, records, and reports 21    arising out of a peer support counseling session 22    prohibited from disclosure under the First Responders 23    Suicide Prevention Act. 24        (pp) Names and all identifying information relating to 25    an employee of an emergency services provider or law 26    enforcement agency under the First Responders Suicide   SB0315 Enrolled- 50 -LRB104 06438 SPS 16474 b1    Prevention Act. 2        (qq) Information and records held by the Department of 3    Public Health and its authorized representatives collected 4    under the Reproductive Health Act. 5        (rr) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 6    the Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act. 7        (ss) Data reported by an employer to the Department of 8    Human Rights pursuant to Section 2-108 of the Illinois 9    Human Rights Act.10        (tt) Recordings made under the Children's Advocacy 11    Center Act, except to the extent authorized under that 12    Act. 13        (uu) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 14    Section 50 of the Sexual Assault Evidence Submission Act. 15        (vv) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 16    subsections (f) and (j) of Section 5-36 of the Illinois 17    Public Aid Code. 18        (ww) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 19    Section 16.8 of the State Treasurer Act. 20        (xx) Information that is exempt from disclosure or 21    information that shall not be made public under the 22    Illinois Insurance Code. 23        (yy) Information prohibited from being disclosed under 24    the Illinois Educational Labor Relations Act.25        (zz) Information prohibited from being disclosed under 26    the Illinois Public Labor Relations Act.   SB0315 Enrolled- 51 -LRB104 06438 SPS 16474 b1        (aaa) Information prohibited from being disclosed 2    under Section 1-167 of the Illinois Pension Code. 3        (bbb) Information that is prohibited from disclosure 4    by the Illinois Police Training Act and the Illinois State 5    Police Act. 6        (ccc) Records exempt from disclosure under Section 7    2605-304 of the Illinois State Police Law of the Civil 8    Administrative Code of Illinois. 9        (ddd) Information prohibited from being disclosed 10    under Section 35 of the Address Confidentiality for 11    Victims of Domestic Violence, Sexual Assault, Human 12    Trafficking, or Stalking Act. 13        (eee) Information prohibited from being disclosed 14    under subsection (b) of Section 75 of the Domestic 15    Violence Fatality Review Act. 16        (fff) Images from cameras under the Expressway Camera 17    Act and all automated license plate reader (ALPR) 18    information used and collected by the Illinois State 19    Police. "ALPR information" means information gathered by 20    an ALPR or created from the analysis of data generated by 21    an ALPR. This subsection (fff) is inoperative on and after 22    July 1, 2028.23        (ggg) Information prohibited from disclosure under 24    paragraph (3) of subsection (a) of Section 14 of the Nurse 25    Agency Licensing Act. 26        (hhh) Information submitted to the Illinois State   SB0315 Enrolled- 52 -LRB104 06438 SPS 16474 b1    Police in an affidavit or application for an assault 2    weapon endorsement, assault weapon attachment endorsement, 3    .50 caliber rifle endorsement, or .50 caliber cartridge 4    endorsement under the Firearm Owners Identification Card 5    Act. 6        (iii) Data exempt from disclosure under Section 50 of 7    the School Safety Drill Act. 8        (jjj) Information exempt from disclosure under Section 9    30 of the Insurance Data Security Law. 10        (kkk) Confidential business information prohibited 11    from disclosure under Section 45 of the Paint Stewardship 12    Act. 13        (lll) Data exempt from disclosure under Section 14    2-3.196 of the School Code. 15        (mmm) Information prohibited from being disclosed 16    under subsection (e) of Section 1-129 of the Illinois 17    Power Agency Act. 18        (nnn) Materials received by the Department of Commerce 19    and Economic Opportunity that are confidential under the 20    Music and Musicians Tax Credit and Jobs Act. 21        (ooo) Data or information provided pursuant to Section 22    20 of the Statewide Recycling Needs and Assessment Act. 23        (ppp) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 24    Section 28-11 of the Lawful Health Care Activity Act. 25        (qqq) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 26    Section 7-101 of the Illinois Human Rights Act.   SB0315 Enrolled- 53 -LRB104 06438 SPS 16474 b1        (rrr) Information prohibited from being disclosed 2    under Section 4-2 of the Uniform Money Transmission 3    Modernization Act. 4        (sss) Information exempt from disclosure under Section 5    40 of the Student-Athlete Endorsement Rights Act.6        (ttt) Audio recordings made under Section 30 of the 7    Illinois State Police Act, except to the extent authorized 8    under that Section. 9        (uuu) Information prohibited from being disclosed 10    under Section 30-5 of the Digital Assets Regulation Act.11        (vvv) (uuu) Information exempt from disclosure under 12    Section 70 of the End-of-Life Options for Terminally Ill 13    Patients Act.14        (www) Information exempt from disclosure under 15    subsection (f) of Section 15 of the Artificial 16    Intelligence Safety Measures Act.17(Source: P.A. 103-8, eff. 6-7-23; 103-34, eff. 6-9-23; 18103-142, eff. 1-1-24; 103-372, eff. 1-1-24; 103-472, eff. 198-1-24; 103-508, eff. 8-4-23; 103-580, eff. 12-8-23; 103-592, 20eff. 6-7-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-636, eff. 7-1-24; 21103-724, eff. 1-1-25; 103-786, eff. 8-7-24; 103-859, eff. 228-9-24; 103-991, eff. 8-9-24; 103-1049, eff. 8-9-24; 103-1081, 23eff. 3-21-25; 104-10, eff. 6-16-25; 104-18, eff. 6-30-25; 24104-417, eff. 8-15-25; 104-428, eff. 8-18-25; 104-441, eff. 259-12-26; 104-457, eff. 6-1-26; revised 1-7-26.)   SB0315 Enrolled- 54 -LRB104 06438 SPS 16474 b1    Section 90. The Whistleblower Act is amended by changing 2Section 15 as follows: 3    (740 ILCS 174/15)4    Sec. 15. Retaliation for certain disclosures prohibited. 5    (a) An employer may not take retaliatory action against an 6employee who discloses or threatens to disclose to a public 7body conducting an investigation, or in a court, an 8administrative hearing, or any other proceeding initiated by a 9public body, information related to an activity, policy, or 10practice of the employer, where the employee has a good faith 11belief that the activity, policy, or practice (i) violates a 12State or federal law, rule, or regulation or (ii) poses a 13substantial and specific danger to employees, public health, 14or safety.15    (b) An employer may not take retaliatory action against an 16employee for disclosing or threatening to disclose information 17to a government or law enforcement agency information related 18to an activity, policy, or practice of the employer, where the 19employee has a good faith belief that the activity, policy, or 20practice of the employer (i) violates a State or federal law, 21rule, or regulation or (ii) poses a substantial and specific 22danger to employees, public health, or safety.23    (c) An employer may not take retaliatory action against an 24employee for disclosing or threatening to disclose to any 25supervisor, principal officer, board member, or supervisor in   SB0315 Enrolled- 55 -LRB104 06438 SPS 16474 b1an organization that has a contractual relationship with the 2employer who makes the employer aware of the disclosure, 3information related to an activity, policy, or practice of the 4employer if the employee has a good faith belief that the 5activity, policy, or practice (i) violates a State or federal 6law, rule, or regulation or (ii) poses a substantial and 7specific danger to employees, public health, or safety. 8    (d) An employer may not take retaliatory action against an 9employee for disclosing or threatening to disclose in good 10faith any violation of Section 5-10 of the Illinois Bivens 11Act. 12    (e) An employer may not take retaliatory action against an 13employee for disclosing or threatening to disclose in good 14faith any violation of the Artificial Intelligence Safety 15Measures Act. 16(Source: P.A. 103-867, eff. 1-1-25; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25; 17104-440, eff. 12-9-25.) 18    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes 19changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 20that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section 21represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does 22not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes 23made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other 24Public Act.   SB0315 Enrolled- 56 -LRB104 06438 SPS 16474 b1    Section 97. Severability. The provisions of this Act are 2severable under Section 1.31 of the Statute on Statutes. 3    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 41, 2027.